Hawaii statutes.
§201B-4 Meetings of the board. (a)
The meetings of the board shall be open to the public as provided in
section 92-3, except that when it is necessary for the board to receive:

(1) Information that is proprietary to a particular
enterprise or the disclosure of which might be harmful to the business
interests of the enterprise; or

(2) Information that is necessary to protect Hawaii's
competitive advantage as a visitor destination; provided that information
relating to marketing plans and strategies may be disclosed after the execution
of the marketing plans and strategies,

the board may enter into an executive meeting that
is closed to the public in accordance with the procedures provided for holding
an executive meeting under part I of chapter 92.

(b) The board shall be subject to the
procedural requirements of section 92-4, and this authorization shall be in
addition to the exceptions listed in section 92-5, to enable the authority
board to respect the proprietary requirements of enterprises with which it has
business dealings. [L 1998, c 156, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 102, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next